Utah statutes.
9-7-402.   Library board of directors -- Expenses.
(1)  When the city governing body decides to establish and maintain a city
public library under the provisions of this part, it shall appoint a library
board of directors of not less than five members and not more than nine
members, chosen from the citizens of the city and based upon their fitness for
the office.
(2)  Only one member of the city governing body may be, at any one time, a
member of the board.
(3)  Each director shall serve without compensation, but their actual and
necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties may be
paid from library funds.
